North Carolina, session 2025, SB921.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to Forsyth Technical
Community College the sum of ten million four hundred thousand dollars ($10,400,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for construction related to, and equipment
necessary for, expansion of training capacity and improvement of readiness and safety through a
comprehensive first responder program, including a training track, building, bridge, classrooms,
and fire apparatus.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S921-v-1*